Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1715
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Welfare Reform Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 15;

Laws 1995, LB 455, § 11;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 358.